North Dakota, session 69, SB2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 12.1-27.1-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. As used in this chapter, the terms "obscene material" and "obscene performance" mean
material or a performance which:
a. Taken as a whole, the average person, applying contemporary North Dakota standards,
would find predominantly appeals to a prurient interest;
b. Depicts or describes in a patently offensive manner sexual conduct, whether normal or
perverted; and
c. Taken as a whole, the reasonable person would find lacking in serious literary, artistic,
political, or scientific value.
Whether material or a performance is obscene must be judged with reference to
ordinaryreasonable adults, unless it appears from the character of the material or the
circumstances of its dissemination that the material or performance is designed for minors or
other specially susceptible audience, in which case the material or performance must be
judged with reference to that type of audience.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 12.1-27.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
As used in this chapter, the term "public library" means a library containing collections of
books or periodicals or both for the general population to read, borrow, or refer to which is
supported with funds derived from taxation.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12.1-27.1-03.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. As used in this section:
a. "Nude or partially denuded human figures" means less than completely and opaquely
covered human genitals, pubic regions, female breasts or a female breast, if the breast
or breasts are exposed below a point immediately above the top of the areola, or human
buttocks; and includes human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state even if
completely and opaquely covered.

S. B. NO. 2307 - PAGE 2
b. "Where minors are or may be invited as a part of the general public" includes any public
roadway or, public walkway, public library, or public school library.
c. The above shallmay not be construed to include a bona fide school, college, university,
museum, public library, or art gallery.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-27.1-03.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-27.1-03.5. Public libraries and school districts prohibited from maintaining explicit
sexual material - Report.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Explicit sexual material" means any material which:
(1) Taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest of minors;
(2) Is patently offensive to prevailing standards in the adult community in North Dakota
as a whole with respect to what is suitable material for minors; and
(3) Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for
minors.
b. "Public library" means a library established under chapter 40-38.
c. "School district" includes a school library or classroom library under the control of the
school district.
2. A public library or a school district may not maintain in its children's collection inventory
booksan area easily accessible to minors that contain explicit sexual material.
3. By January 1, 20242026, each public library and school district shall develop a policy and
process for reviewing library collections to ensure conformance with the requirements of this
section. The policy must include a procedure:
a. For the removal or relocation of explicit sexual material in the publica library to an area in
the library not easily accessible to minors;
b. For the development of a book and media collection that is appropriate for the age and
maturity levels of the individuals who may access the materials, and which is suitable for,
and consistent with, the purpose of the library or school district;
c. For the public library to receive, evaluate, and respond torelocation of materials to an
area not easily accessible to minors, upon a request from an individual regarding the
removal or relocation of one or more of the books or other materials in the library
collection containingto relocate explicit sexual material in the library collection; and
d. For the activation of a diverse decisionmaking committee to reconsider the relocation of
explicit sexual material in the library collection, if the individual is unsatisfied with the
result under subdivision c ;
e. To refer an individual to section 7 of this Act, if the individual is unsatisfied with the resul t
of the reconsideration under subdivision d; and
f. To periodically review the library collection to ensure the library collection does not
contain explicit sexual material in the children's collectioncompliance with this section.
4. Each public library and school district shall provide a compliance report to the legislative
management before May 1, 20242026, on the implementation of collection development and

S. B. NO. 2307 - PAGE 3
relocation of materials policies as required by this section and to ensure sufficient compliance
with this section.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-27.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-27.1-11. Exceptions to criminal liability.
Sections 12.1-27.1-01 and 12.1-27.1-03 shallmay not apply to the possession or distribution of
material in the course of law enforcement, judicial, or legislative activities; or to the possession of
material by a bona fide school, college, university, museum, or public library for limited access for
educational research purposes carried on at such anthe institution by adults only. Sections 12.1-27.1-01
and 12.1-27.1-03 shall alsomay not apply to a person who is returning material, found to be obscene, to
the distributor or publisher initially delivering it to the person returning it.
SECTION 6. A new section to chapter 12.1-27.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Safety policies and technology protection measures required - Report .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Explicit sexual material" means the term as defined under section 12.1 - 27.1 - 03.5 .
b. "Public library" does not include the state library.
c. "State agency" does not include the state library or institutions of higher education.
2. A school district, state agency, or public library may offer digital or online library database
resources to students in kindergarten through grade twelve if the person providing the
resources verifies all the resources comply with subsection 3 .
3. Digital or online library database resources offered by a school district, state agency, or public
library to students in kindergarten through grade twelve must have safety policies and
technology protection measures that:
a. Prohibit and prevent a user of the resource from sending, receiving, viewing, or
downloading materials constituting an obscene performance or explicit sexual material;
and
b. Filter or block access to explicit sexual material.
4. Notwithstanding any contract provision, if a provider of digital or online library resources fails
to comply with subsection 3, the school district, state agency, or public library shall withhold
any further payments to the provider pending verification of compliance.
5. If a provider of digital or online library database resources fails to timely verify the provider is
in compliance with the safety policies and requirements of subsection 3, the school district ,
state agency, or public library shall consider the provider's act of noncompliance a breach of
contract.
6. A public school library and a public library shall submit an aggregate written report to the
legislative management no later than December first of each year regarding any:
a. Issues related to provider compliance with technology protection measures required by
subsection 3; and
b. Incidents of complaints regarding accessible materials.

S. B. NO. 2307 - PAGE 4
7. By January 1, 2026, each school district, state agency, or public library offering digital or
online library database resources to students in kindergarten through grade twelve shall
develop a policy and process for reviewing digital or online library database resources to
ensure conformance with this section. The policy must include a procedure:
a. For an individual to report to the school district, state agency, or public library materials
containing explicit sexual material or an obscene performance in the digital or online
library database resources;
b. Upon receipt of a report under subdivision a, for the school district, state agency, or
public library, to provide the report to the provider of digital or online library database
resources and apprise the individual of the actions taken to comply with this section; and
c. To refer an individual to section 7 of this Act, if the individual believes this section is being
violated after being apprised of the actions taken to comply with the section.
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 12.1-27.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State's attorney - Obscenity review procedure - School districts - State agencies - Public
libraries - Penalty.
1. Any interested individual who has exhausted the procedures under section 12.1 - 27.1 - 03.5 or
section 6 of this Act may request, in the manner prescribed by the local state's attorney, the
local state's attorney's opinion to review an alleged violation under section 12.1 - 27.1 - 03.5 or
section 6 of this Act. Within sixty days of receiving the request, the state's attorney shall issue
an opinion on the alleged violation to the interested individual, the provider of digital or online
library database resources, if any, and the school district, state agency, or public library under
review.
2. If the state's attorney determines a public library or state agency has violated section
12.1 - 27.1 - 03.5 or section 6 of this Act, the state's attorney shall defer any prosecution and
notify the public library or state agency. After receiving notice, the public library or state
agency shall take corrective action to comply with the violated law within ten days. If the public
library or state agency fails to comply with the law within ten days, the state's attorney :
a. Shall notify the state treasurer who shall withhold and return funds allocated to the state
agency or public library, until the state's attorney has determined the state agency or
public library is in compliance with the relevant statute and has notified the state
treasurer accordingly; and
b. May prosecute for failure to comply with the law.
3. If the state's attorney determines a school district has violated section 12.1 - 27.1 - 03.5 or
section 6 of this Act, the state's attorney shall defer any prosecution and notify the schoo l
district. After receiving notice, the school district shall take corrective action to comply with the
violated law within ten days. If the school district fails to comply with the law within ten days,
the state's attorney:
a. Shall notify the superintendent of public instruction who shall withhold funds allocated to
the school district until the state's attorney has determined the school district is in
compliance with the relevant statute and has notified the superintendent of public
instruction accordingly; and
b. May prosecute for failure to comply with the law.

S. B. NO. 2307 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2307.
Senate Vote: Yeas 27 Nays 20 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 49 Nays 45 Absent 0
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State

S. B. NO. 2307 - PAGE 6
Honorable Michael Howe
Secretary of State
Bismarck, North Dakota
I certify this Act, Senate Bill No. 2307, together with the objections of Governor Armstrong, was
returned to the Senate, being the body in which it originated, on April 24, 2025; that the objections of
the Governor were entered upon the Journal on April 25, 2025; that the Bill was taken up for
reconsideration; that the motion for reconsideration failed on April 25, 2025, at 1:15 p.m.; and the roll
was called and the Bill failed to pass, with less than two-thirds of the members-elect voting in the
affirmative.
Vote: Yeas 25
Nays 20
Absent and
not voting 2
____________________________
President of the Senate
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate